North Carolina, session 2025, SB255.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the City of Greenville
the nonrecurring sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be
used to replace the existing bulkhead in the Town Common park to alleviate flooding issues and
deteriorating structural stability and to improve resiliency to flood events.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S255-v-1*